New Jersey, session 222, S4407.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2023, c.139 (C.30:4-27.9a) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 9 of P.L.1987, c.116 (C.30:4-27.9) or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, commencing on the effective date of P.L.2023, c.139 (C.30:4-27.9a et al.) and ending on the last day of the [36th] 44th calendar month following that effective date, a short-term care or psychiatric facility, or a special psychiatric hospital, may detain a person admitted to the facility involuntarily by referral from a screening service without a temporary court order for no more than 72 hours from the time the screening certificate was executed. Except in the event a general hospital was granted a temporary court order permitting the continued hold of the person pursuant to subsection b. of this section, which delayed a person's admission to the short-term care or psychiatric facility or special psychiatric hospital, a short-term care or psychiatric facility or special psychiatric hospital shall not detain a person admitted to the facility involuntarily by referral from a screening service without a temporary court order for more than 72 hours from the time the screening certificate was executed. Within 24 hours of admission, the admitting facility shall initiate court proceedings for the involuntary commitment of the person pursuant to section 10 of P.L.1987, c.116 (C.30:4-27.10) and request a temporary court order permitting the continued hold of the person pending the return date of the involuntary commitment hearing, which shall take place no later than 20 days from initial commitment. b.    (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 9 of P.L.1987, c.116 (C.30:4-27.9) or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, commencing on the effective date of P.L.2023, c.139 (C.30:4-27.9a et al.) and ending on the last day of the [36th] 44th calendar month following that effective date, a general hospital, including any satellite emergency department of a general hospital, may not detain a person for more than 72 hours from the time a screening certificate is executed, unless the hospital or emergency department obtains a temporary court order permitting the continued hold of the person for up to 72 additional hours, as determined by the court, or the person, through the person's counsel, provides consent for the continued hold.  If it becomes evident that a hospital or emergency department will not be able to discharge or admit the person to another facility within 72 hours, the hospital, emergency department, or, as applicable, the Designated Screening Service provider, shall submit an emergent application for such order.  The hospital or emergency department shall continue to hold the person during the pendency of the application and any investigation conducted by the person's counsel, provided that appropriate treatment that meets the standard of care is being rendered to the person.  The Office of the Public Defender and other designated counsel, as applicable, shall be notified of the emergent application and provided with a copy of the application and all supporting documents.  The court shall appoint the Office of the Public Defender as counsel to represent the patient, if there is no other designated counsel.  The application may be decided by the court on documentary presentations relevant to the standards established under paragraph (2) of this subsection.  At the request of counsel, the court shall conduct a hearing on the record, at which hearing the court shall consider the arguments of counsel and all relevant evidence submitted.  The court shall determine the format of the hearing based on the apparent complexity of the matter and the extent of doubt as to the merits of the application, and may, at its discretion, rely on certifications from witnesses or require live testimony. The court shall not grant a temporary order granting the continued hold of a person, unless the person's counsel has been designated and notified, completed any necessary interviews with the patient and investigations, and provided notice to the court on the counsel's position on the extended hold. (2)  The court may grant a temporary order granting the continued hold of a person upon an application submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection if the hospital, emergency department, or, as applicable, the Designated Screening Service provider: (a)   exhausted all reasonable efforts to place the individual in a short-term care or psychiatric facility, or special psychiatric hospital, depending on which facility is appropriate for the person's condition and is the least restrictive environment, and has completed a form as a part of the application, which form shall include the dates of the outreach to each short-term care facility or centralized admission, in the case of a forensic patient, and the response from each short-term care facility or centralized admission and if applicable, the specific reason for rejection.  In the case of a forensic patient, a hospital, emergency department, or, as applicable, the Designated Screening Service provider shall not be required to conduct outreach to facilities that do not serve forensic patients; and (b)  demonstrates that there is a substantial likelihood that, by reason of mental illness, the person will be dangerous to the person's own self or others based upon the certification of two psychiatrists who have examined the patient and deemed the patient is in need of involuntary commitment, such examinations may be conducted using telemedicine or telehealth consistent with the standard of care required for the assessment and treatment of the person's condition. The court shall include such conditions in the temporary order as the court deems appropriate to promote diligent efforts to locate an available facility to accommodate the patient's needs and protect the rights of the person detained pending commitment.  In the event that the hospital, emergency department, or, as applicable, the Designated Screening Service provider, is unable to place the person into an appropriate facility within the 72 hours of continued hold permitted by the temporary court order, the hospital or emergency department may continue to hold the person, provided that the person's counsel provides consent for the hold and appropriate treatment that meets the standard of care is being rendered to the person.  The Office of the Public Defender shall be notified and provided with a copy of any temporary court order granted pursuant to this paragraph.  The patient shall receive a court hearing with respect to the issue of continued need for involuntary commitment within 20 days from the date of initial commitment or within 20 days from the date an application was filed pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, whichever date occurs first, unless the patient has been administratively discharged pursuant to section 17 of P.L.1987, c.116 (C.30:4-27.17). (3)  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, commencing on the effective date of P.L.2023, c.139 (C.30:4-27.9a et al.) and ending on the last day of the [36th] 44th calendar month following that effective date, each general hospital and emergency department shall prepare and submit to the Department of Human Services a quarterly report, which report shall include, but not be limited to, information on: (a)   the number of applications submitted to the court for a temporary court order permitting the continued hold of a person beyond 72 hours pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection; (b)  the number of temporary court orders granted pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection permitting the continued hold of a person beyond 72 hours; (c)   whether a person detained for longer than 72 hours: has a criminal history; has a co-occurring substance use disorder; has a co-occurring intellectual or developmental disability; has health insurance and, if so, the type of health insurance coverage; has a complex medical condition; or is unable to be released because the 72-hour timeframe falls on a weekend and either admission to treatment facilities are not provided on weekends or discharges from the facility do not occur on weekends; (d)  the length of time each individual was held beyond 72 hours before finding appropriate placement in a treatment facility; (e)   the number of individuals placed in an appropriate treatment facility within 72 hours; and (f)   any other information the department deems necessary. Any information included in a report concerning specific individuals shall be de-identified.  Each report shall be made available to the public within 60 days of the date the Department of Human Services receives the report. c.    (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the Commissioner of Health may, to the extent the commissioner finds necessary, commencing 120 days following the effective date of P.L.2023, c.139 (C.30:4-27.9a et al.) and ending on the last day of the [27th] 35th calendar month following that effective date, allow a general acute care hospital that is licensed for acute care hospital psychiatric beds to apply to the Department of Health for temporary licenses for beds for the involuntary commitment of patients.  The department may issue temporary licenses pursuant to this paragraph if the hospital demonstrates in its application a need for such beds based on retrospective data demonstrating the need for involuntary commitment beds, a showing that the hospital continually exhausts all reasonable efforts to place individuals in short-term care, psychiatric facilities, or special psychiatric hospitals, and any other factors as determined by the Commissioner of Health.  Any temporary license granted pursuant to this paragraph, unless otherwise confirmed at the next certificate of need review, as required pursuant to N.J.A.C.8:33-4.4 or its successor regulation, shall expire within 90 days of the Commissioner of Health's decision rendered pursuant to that full review process. (2)  The Department of Health shall make available on its Internet website and continuously update information concerning the total number of temporary licenses granted pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, as well as the number of temporary licenses granted to each hospital that submitted an application pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection. (3)  The department shall submit information concerning the total number of temporary licenses granted pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, as well as the number of temporary licenses granted to each hospital that submitted an application pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, to the Commissioner of Human Services, which information shall:  (a) be submitted in a manner that allows the Commissioner of Human Services sufficient time to include the information in the report required pursuant to subsection b. and c. of section 2 of P.L.2023, c.139 (C.30:4-27.3a); and (b) reflect the number of temporary licenses granted as of the date the information is submitted. (cf: P.L.2025, c.108, s.2) 2.    Section 3 of P.L.2025, c.108 (C.30:4-27.9b) is amended to read as follows: 3.    The Department of Human Services shall establish an educational committee of stakeholders, which educational committee, commencing on the effective date of P.L.2025, c.108 (C.30:4-27.9b et al.) and ending on the last day of the [36th] 44th calendar month following the effective date of P.L.2023, c.139 (C.30:4-27.9a et al.), shall provide education to short-term care facilities and individual county assignment judges about the legal obligations of short-term care facilities to accept patients.  Thereafter, the Department of Human Services shall provide the education to short-term care facilities and individual county assignment judges, as necessary. (cf: P.L.2025, c.108, s.3) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.